Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.090

Housing and industrial development bonds and municipal obligations in any state.

A mutual savings bank may invest in housing or industrial development bonds or municipal obligations issued by a state, county, parish, borough, city, or district situated in the United States, or by any instrumentality thereof, provided such bonds or obligations at the time of purchase are prudent investments.

[ 1985 c 56 s 11; 1955 c 13 s 32.20.090. Prior: 1937 c 95 s 5; 1929 c 74 s 8; 1921 c 156 s 11f; RRS s 3381-8.]